Hawaii, session 2026, SB2257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a connection between the protection of the environment and public health.  The most significant health threat of commercial burning results from the inhalation of fine particulates produced when wood and other organic materials burn.  According to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, exposure to fine particulate air pollution has been linked with respiratory and cardiovascular conditions, including but not limited to asthma, chronic bronchitis, irregular heartbeat, heart attacks, and the risk of death for individuals suffering from heart disease or lung disease.  Studies have shown racial and ethnic minorities have been found to be exposed at higher rates to air pollution based on factors such as socioeconomic status, area of residence, occupation, and neighborhood segregation. The legislature further finds that a 2020 study found that poor air quality and air pollution derived from human activities lead to over one hundred thousand deaths in the United States during a single year.  Therefore, preventative measures against air pollution may help save lives along with legislation to decrease the concentration of fine air particulate pollution to lower the risk of all-cause mortality. The purpose of this Act is to prohibit the issuance of permits for commercial vegetative burning in residential neighborhoods or within the vicinity of residential areas. SECTION 2. Chapter 342B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342B-    Vegetative burning in residential areas.  The department shall not issue permits for the commercial burning of green waste products within residential areas or areas within one thousand feet of a residential property. This prohibition shall not apply to the permitted roasting of coffee." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________